Utah statutes.
26-9f-102.   Definitions.
As used in this chapter:
(1)  "Commission" means the Utah Digital Health Service Commission created in
Section 26-9f-103.
(2) "Digital health service" means the electronic transfer, exchange, or
management of related data for diagnosis, treatment, consultation,
educational, public health, or other related purposes.
